Tennessee, session 114, HB1874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-116(e), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting instead the following:
(2) "Hybrid electric vehicle":
(A) Means a vehicle propelled by a combination of an electric motor and
an internal combustion engine or other power source and components thereof;
and
(B) Does not include a low speed vehicle or a medium speed vehicle;
and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1874
009450
- 1 -